New York, session 2025-2026, S1164.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph b of subdivision 16 of section 415 of the vehicle 2 and traffic law, as amended by chapter 7 of the laws of 2000, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 b. Except as provided in paragraph c of this subdivision, any person 5 who operates as a dealer without being registered shall be required to 6 pay to the people of this state a civil penalty in the sum of [one] two 7 thousand dollars. However, any such person against whom such penalty has 8 been assessed may avoid all but [five] seven hundred fifty dollars of 9 such penalty by obtaining a registration as required by this article, 10 provided that application for such registration is made not more than 11 ten days after the imposition of such penalty. 12 § 2. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new section 13 2267-a to read as follows: 14 § 2267-a. Dealers and manufacturers of limited use motorcycles. 1. No 15 person shall engage in the business of selling limited use motorcycles, 16 as defined in section one hundred twenty-one-b of this chapter, unless 17 there shall have been issued to them a dealer registration in accordance 18 with section four hundred fifteen of this chapter. The commissioner may, 19 by regulation, provide for identification of dealers as being dealers in 20 limited use motorcycles, and shall make provisions for the issuance of 21 appropriate dealer demonstrator number plates to such dealers. 22 2. No dealer shall acquire any limited use motorcycle for the purpose 23 of resale for use on the public highways within this state unless such 24 limited use motorcycle has a vehicle identification number in a form and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02275-01-5 S. 1164 2 1 manner acceptable to the commissioner permanently affixed to the frame 2 by the manufacturer or authorized agent of the manufacturer. 3 3. Fees assessed under this section shall be paid to the commissioner 4 for deposit to the general fund which shall be deposited to the dedi- 5 cated highway and bridge trust fund established pursuant to section 6 eighty-nine-b of the state finance law and the dedicated mass transpor- 7 tation fund established pursuant to section eighty-nine-c of the state 8 finance law and distributed according to the provisions of subdivision 9 (d) of section three hundred one-j of the tax law. 10 4. The commissioner may prescribe, by regulation, procedures to be 11 followed by dealers with respect to record keeping and documents 12 required upon the sale of a limited use motorcycle, and procedures to be 13 followed by manufacturers with respect to the assignment and affixing of 14 vehicle identification numbers. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 16 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 17 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 18 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 19 completed on or before such effective date.